Florida, session 2026, SB1616.
Be It Enacted by the Legislature of the State of Florida: 16 17 Section 1.âSection 768.1258, Florida Statutes, is created 18 to read: 19 768.1258âLiability of advanced driving system manufacturers 20 and developers.â 21 (1)âIt is the intent of the Legislature to promote 22 innovative conduct and the safe deployment of advanced driving 23 systems while providing reasonable certainty in the allocation 24 of liability. 25 (2)âAs used in this section, the term âadvanced driving 26 systemâ means any software, device, or integrated hardware 27 software combination that, when engaged or deployed, is capable 28 of performing specific driving tasks or functions without human 29 intervention, with or without a human driver or human 30 supervision, for at least part of its system operation, and that 31 is equipped on a motor vehicle that is permitted, registered, 32 licensed, certified, or authorized, and not otherwise 33 prohibited, for use or operation in this state. The term 34 includes, but is not limited to, advanced driver assistance 35 systems as defined in s. 559.903, automated driving systems as 36 defined in s. 316.003, and vehicle systems defined as Level 2 or 37 greater under SAE Internationalâs J3016 standard. 38 (3)âA manufacturer or developer of an advanced driving 39 system, or any affiliate, subsidiary, or employee thereof, is 40 not liable for any damages, injuries, claims, or losses alleged 41 to have arisen from, or in relation to, the design, failure to 42 warn, or performance of the advanced driving system under 43 theories of strict product liability, negligence, 44 misrepresentation, breach of warranty, or breach of contract, 45 unless a plaintiff proves by clear and convincing evidence that: 46 (a)âThe plaintiffâs harm directly arose from a known 47 manufacturing defect in a hardware component contained within 48 the advanced driving system; 49 (b)âThe advanced driving system failed to comply with an 50 applicable federal motor vehicle safety standard related to 51 advanced driving systems; 52 (c)âAt the time of the alleged incident, the advanced 53 driving system was operating outside its intended operational 54 design domain, if applicable. For purposes of this section, 55 operational design domains do not apply to Level 1 or 2 vehicles 56 as defined by SAE Internationalâs J3016 standard; or 57 (d)âThe manufacturer or developer engaged in fraud or 58 intentional concealment of a known defect that presented an 59 unreasonable risk to the safety of the plaintiff. 60 (4)(a)âPunitive damages are permitted only when the 61 evidence supports a finding that the manufacturer or developer 62 engaged in fraud or intentional concealment of a known defect 63 that presented an unreasonable risk to the safety of the 64 plaintiff. 65 (b)âA plaintiff may not recover an award of punitive 66 damages if the manufacturer or developer establishes that the 67 design of its advanced driving system complied with the state of 68 the art of scientific and technical knowledge that existed at 69 the time of manufacture in accordance with s. 768.1257. 70 (5)âThis section does not limit any claim based on breach 71 of warranty, express statutory duties, or independent acts of 72 negligence that are unrelated to the design, manufacture, 73 failure to warn, or performance of an advanced driving system. 74 (6)âTo the extent that s. 768.1256 conflicts with this 75 section, this section prevails. 76 Section 2.âThis act shall take effect July 1, 2026.